pt-PT: tipo de fixação da tampa de enchimento de óleo: Baioneta (um quarto de volta); Tampa rebatível (com dobradiça); Encaixe por pressão (ajuste por pressão); Enroscado (de aparafusar); Tranca rotativa (não enroscada); Outro
en: Oil filler cap attachment type: Bayonet (quarter-turn); Flip-top (hinged); Push-in (press-fit); Threaded (screw-on); Twist-lock (non-threaded); Other
fr: Type de fixation du bouchon de remplissage d’huile: À baïonnette (quart de tour); Couvercle rabattable (à charnière); À enfoncer (ajustement serré); Fileté (à visser); Verrouillage par rotation (non fileté); Autre
zh-CN: 机油加注盖固定方式: 卡口式（四分之一转）; 翻盖式（铰接）; 压入式（过盈配合）; 螺纹式（拧入式）; 旋锁式（无螺纹）; 其他
ja: オイルフィラーキャップの取り付けタイプ: バヨネット (クォーターターン); フリップトップ (ヒンジ); プッシュイン (プレスフィット); ネジ式 (スクリューオン); ツイストロック (ねじ山なし); その他
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrjevanja pokrovčka za nalivanje olja: Bajonetni (na četrt obrata); Preklopni (s tečajem); Na potisk (tlačno prileganje); Navojni (na privijanje); Zaklep na zasuk (brez navoja); Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul de atașare al capacului de umplere cu ulei: Baionetă (sfert de rotație); Capac rabatabil (cu balama); Prin apăsare (presare); Filetat (înșurubabil); Blocare prin răsucire (nefiletat); Altele
ko: 오일 주입구 캡 부착 유형: 베이어넷(1/4 회전); 플립탑(힌지형); 푸시인(프레스 핏); 나사형(스크루 온); 트위스트 락(비나사형); 기타
da: Fastgørelsestype for oliepåfyldningsdæksel: Bajonet (kvart omdrejning); Flip-top (hængslet); Push-in (prespasning); Gevind (skrues på); Twist-lock (uden gevind); Andet
cs: Typ upevnění víčka plnicího hrdla oleje: Bajonetový (čtvrtotáčkový); Výklopný (s pantem); Zastrkávací (lisovaný); Závitový (šroubovací); Otočný (bezzávitový); Ostatní
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на капачката за наливане на масло: Байонет (на четвърт оборот); С отварящо се капаче (на панта); С натискане (пресова сглобка); С резба (завинтване); Със завъртане (без резба); Друго
nl: Olievuldop bevestigingstype: Bajonet (kwartslag); Klepdeksel (scharnierend); Insteek (perspassing); Met schroefdraad (opschroefbaar); Draaisluiting (zonder schroefdraad); Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja čepa za punjenje ulja: Bajunetno (četvrtina okreta); Preklopno (na šarkama); Pritisno (prešani dosjed); S navojem (zavrtanje); Zaključavanje okretom (bez navoja); Ostalo
ru: Тип крепления крышки маслозаливной горловины: Байонетное (на четверть оборота); Откидное (на петлях); Вставное (прессовая посадка); Резьбовое (навинчивающееся); Поворотная фиксация (без резьбы); Другое
it: Tipo di fissaggio del tappo di riempimento dell'olio: Baionetta (un quarto di giro); A scatto (a cerniera); A spinta (a pressione); Filettato (avvitabile); Gira e blocca (non filettato); Altro
lt-LT: Alyvos užpildymo dangtelio tvirtinimo tipas: Bajonetinis (ketvirčio pasukimo); Atverčiamas (su vyriais); Įkišamas (įspaudžiamas); Sriegiuotas (užsukamas); Sukamas fiksatorius (nesriegiuotas); Kita
pl: Typ mocowania korka wlewu oleju: Bagnetowy (ćwierć obrotu); Z klapką (na zawiasie); Wciskany; Gwintowany (wkręcany); Zamykany przez obrót (niegwintowany); Inny
nb: Festetype for oljepåfyllingslokk: Bajonett (kvart omdreining); Flipptopp (hengslet); Trykk-inn (presspasning); Gjenget (skrus på); Vrilås (ugjenget); Annet
hu: Olajbetöltő sapka rögzítési típusa: Bajonettzáras (negyedfordulatos); Felnyitható (zsanéros); Bepattintható (présillesztéses); Menetes (rácsavarható); Elfordítva záródó (nem menetes); Egyéb
es: Tipo de fijación de la tapa de llenado de aceite: Bayoneta (cuarto de vuelta); Tapa abatible (con bisagra); A presión (ajuste a presión); Roscado (enroscable); Bloqueo por giro (sin rosca); Otro
tr: Yağ doldurma kapağı bağlantı tipi: Bayonet (çeyrek tur); Üstten açılır (menteşeli); Geçmeli (pres geçme); Dişli (vidalı); Çevirmeli kilit (dişsiz); Diğer
fi: Öljyn täyttökorkin kiinnitystyyppi: Bajonetti (neljänneskierros); Käännettävä (saranoitu); Painettava (puristussovite); Kierteitetty (kierrettävä); Kiertolukko (kierteetön); Muu
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia plniaceho uzáveru oleja: Bajonetový (štvrťotáčkový); Odklápací (s pántom); Zatláčací (zásuvný); Závitový (skrutkovací); Otočný zámok (bez závitu); Iný
pt-BR: Tampa de abastecimento de óleo fixação tipo: Baioneta (um quarto de volta); Tampa articulada (dobradiça); De empurrar (encaixe sob pressão); Rosqueado (de rosquear); Trava por torção (sem rosca); Outro
zh-TW: 機油加註蓋固定類型: 卡口式 (四分之一轉); 掀蓋式 (鉸鏈); 推入式 (壓合); 螺紋式 (旋入); 旋轉鎖定式 (無螺紋); 其他
sv: Fästtyp för oljepåfyllningslock: Bajonettfattning (kvartsvarv); Gångjärnslock (flip-top); Tryck-i (presspassning); Gängad (skruvas på); Vridlås (ogängad); Övrigt
vi: Loại gắn nắp đổ dầu: Ngàm ngạnh (xoay một phần tư); Nắp bật (có bản lề); Nhấn vào (lắp ép); Có ren (vặn ốc); Khóa vặn (không ren); Khác
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης καπακιού πλήρωσης λαδιού: Μπαγιονέτ (τέταρτου της στροφής); Αναδιπλούμενο πάνω μέρος (με μεντεσέ); Κουμπωτό (πρεσαριστό); Με σπείρωμα (βιδωτό); Κλείδωμα με περιστροφή (χωρίς σπείρωμα); Άλλο
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งฝาปิดช่องเติมน้ำมัน: เขี้ยวล็อก (หมุนหนึ่งส่วนสี่รอบ); ฝาพับ (มีบานพับ); ดันเข้า (สวมอัด); แบบเกลียว (ขันสกรู); บิดล็อก (ไม่มีเกลียว); อื่นๆ
de: Befestigungsart des Öleinfülldeckels: Bajonett (Vierteldrehung); Klappdeckel (mit Scharnier); Steckverschluss (Presspassung); Mit Gewinde (Aufschraubbar); Drehverschluss (ohne Gewinde); Andere